Utah statutes.
53A-11-1212.   Appeals -- Procedures.

(1) (a)  Each completed application or complaint shall be approved, denied, or investigated by the school within a reasonable amount of time.

(b)  If an application or complaint is denied, written reasons for the denial or results of the investigation shall be stated and, if appropriate, suggested corrections shall be made to remedy the deficiency.

(c)  Each club that is denied school building use shall be informed at the time of the denial of the factual and legal basis for the denial, and, if appropriate, how the basis for the denial could be corrected.

(2) (a)  If denied, suspended, or terminated, a club, student desirous of participating or speaking, or a complaining parent or guardian, has 10 school days from the date of the denial, suspension, or termination to file a written appeal from the denial, suspension, or termination to a designee authorized by the school governing board.

(b)  The designee shall issue a determination within a reasonable amount of time from receipt of the appeal, which decision is final and constitutes satisfaction of all administrative remedies unless the time for evaluation is extended by agreement of all parties.

(3)  A person directly affected by a decision made in accordance with the provisions of this part may appeal the decision by writing to a person designated by the school governing board.

